Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,253.01
Salvage operation, defined.

Salvage operation shall mean an operation which reconditions, sells, distributes, brokers, or otherwise supplies any distressed or salvaged food.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 15.